Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2909
Certificate of veterinary inspection, defined.

Certificate of veterinary inspection means a legible document, paper, or electronic submission, issued by an accredited veterinarian at the point of origin of an animal movement which meets federal and state requirements for interstate or intrastate movement of animals. Certificate of veterinary inspection does not include Form 7001 of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 9.